en: peanut, peanuts
ar: فول سوداني
ay: chuqupa
az: araxis
bg: фъстък, фъстъци
bs: kikiriki
ca: cacauet, cacauets
cs: arašídy
da: jordnød, jordnødder, peanuts
de: Erdnuss, Erdnüsse, Erdnüssen, Erdnusse, Erdnusskerne
el: αραχίδες, αραχίδα, αραπικα φιστικια
eo: ternukso
es: cacahuetes, cacahuete, cacahuates, cacahuate, maní
et: maapähkel, maapähklid, maapähkleid
fi: maapähkinä, maapähkinät, maapähkinää
fr: arachides, arachide, cacahuètes, cacahuète, cacahouètes, cacahouète
ga: cnó talún, piseanna
gu: મગફળી
ha: gyaɗa
he: בוטן, בוטנים, חמאת בוטנים
hr: kikiriki, kikirikija
hu: földimogyoró, amerikaimogyoró
ia: cacahuete
it: arachide, arachidi
ja: ラッカセイ, 落花生
ka: არაქისი
ko: 땅콩
ku: fistiqa axê
la: arachis hypogaea
ln: ngúba
lt: žemės riešutai, žemės riešutų
lv: zemesrieksti, zemesriekstus, zemesriekstu
mr: भुईमूग
mt: karawett
nb: peanøtter
nl: pinda, pinda's, aardnoot, aardnoten, pindanoten, pindas, vliespinda's
nn: peanøtter
nv: neeshchʼííłbáhí
pl: orzeszki, orzeszki arachidowe, orzeszki ziemne, arachidowe, orzechy arachidowe, orzeszków ziemnych, orzeszków arachidowych, orzechów ziemnych, orzechów arachidowych, orzechy ziemne
pt: amendoim, amendois, amendoins
ro: alune, arahide
ru: арахис
sk: arašidy
sl: arašidi, araśidi, kikiriki
sn: nzungu
sr: кикирики
sv: jordnöt, jordnötter, jordnöts
th: ถั่วลิสง
tr: yer fıstığı, yerfıstığı
tt: җир чикләвеге
uz: yeryongʻoq
yi: סטאשקע
za: duhdoem
zh: 花生仁, 花生

en: caramelised peanut
de: karamellisierte erdnüsse
fr: cacahuète caramélisée, cacahuètes caramélisées
it: arachidi caramellate

en: roasted peanut, roasted peanuts
bg: печени фъстъци
da: ristet jordnød, ristede peanuts
de: geröstete Erdnüsse
es: cacahuetes tostados, maní tostado
fi: paahdettu maapähkinä, paahdetut maapähkinät
fr: cacahuètes grillées
hr: prženi kikiriki
it: arachidi tostate
ja: ローストピーナッツ
lt: skrudinti žemės riešutai
nl: geroosterde pinda's, geroosterde pindanoten
pt: amendoim torrado
ro: arahide coapte
ru: арахис обжаренный
sv: rostad jordnöt, rostade jordnötter
tr: kavrulmuş yer fıstığı, kavrulmuş yerfıstığı

en: organic roasted peanut, organic roasted peanuts
da: økologisk ristet jordnød
de: geröstete biologisch Erdnüsse
el: φυστίκια ψημένος βιολογική
es: cacahuetes tostados ecológicos
fi: paahdettu luomu maapähkinä, paahdetut luomu maapähkinät
fr: arachides grillées biologique
hr: organski prženi kikiriki
it: arachidi tostate biologiche
nl: biologische geroosterde pinda's
pt: amendoim torrado biológico
sv: ekologisk rostad jordnöt, ekologiska rostade jordnötter, ekologisk rostade jordnötter

en: milled roasted peanut, milled roasted peanuts
da: malet ristet jordnød
de: Erdnüsse geröstet und gemahlen, geröstete und gemahlene Erdnüsse, gemahlene geröstete Erdnüsse, geröstete gemahlene Erdnüsse
es: cacahuetes tostados molidos
fr: cacahuètes grillées moulues, arachides grillées moulues
hr: mljeveni prženi kikiriki
it: arachidi tostate macinate
nl: geroosterde germalen pinda's
pt: amendoim torrado moído, amendoins torrados moídos
sv: mald rostad jordnöt

en: shelled peanut, shelled peanuts
da: afskallet jordnød, jordnød uden skal
de: geschälte Erdnüsse
fi: kuoreton maapähkinä, kuorettomat maapähkinät
fr: cacahuètes décortiquées
hr: kikiriki bez opne
it: arachidi sgusciate
nl: Pinda's in de dop
pt: amendoim sem casca
sv: jordnöt utan skal, jordnötter utan skal

en: peanut with shell
da: jordnød med skal
de: Erdnüsse mit Schale
es: cacahuete con cáscara
fi: kuorellinen maapähkinä
fr: cacahuète avec coque
hr: kikiriki s ljuskom
it: arachidi con guscio
nl: pinda met schil
pt: amendoim com casca
sv: jordnöt med skal, jordnötter med skal

en: peanut flour
ar: دقيق الفول السوداني
bg: фъстъчено брашно, брашно от фъстъци
ca: flor del cacauet
da: jordnøddemel
de: Erdnussmehl
es: harina de cacahuete, harina de maní
fr: farine d'arachide
hr: brašno od kikirikija
it: farina di arachidi
jv: glepung kacang
ko: 땅콩가루
nl: pinda bloem, pindameel
pl: mąka arachidowa, mąka z orzeszków ziemnych, mąki arachidowej
pt: farinha de amendoim
sl: arašidova moka
sv: jordnötsmjöl
zh: 花生粉

en: honey roasted peanut, honey roasted peanuts
de: honiggeröstete Erdnüsse
es: cacahuetes tostados con miel, maní tostado con miel, maníes tostados con miel, cacahuate tostado con miel, cacahuete tostado con miel, cacahuetes tostados con miel
fi: hunajapaahdettu maapähkinä
hr: u medu pečeni kikiriki
it: arachidi tostate al miele
pt: amendoim torrado com mel
sv: honungsrostad jordnöt, honungsrostade jordnötter

en: peanut butter
bg: фъстъчено масло
cs: arašídové máslo
da: jordnøddesmør
de: Erdnussbutter
es: crema de cacahuete, crema de maní
fr: beurre d'arachide, beurre de cacahuète, beurre de cacahouète
hr: kikiriki maslac
it: burro di arachidi
ja: ピーナッツバーター
nb: peanøttssmör
nl: pindakaas
pl: masło z orzeszków ziemnych
pt: manteiga de amendoim
sv: jordnötssmör

en: crunchy peanut butter
da: sprødt jordnøddesmør
de: knusprige Erdnussbutter
es: crema de cacahuete crujiente, crema de cacahuete con trozos
hr: hrskavi maslac od kikirikija
it: burro di arachidi croccante
pt: manteiga de amendoim crocante
sv: jordnötssmör med bitar

en: peanut paste
bg: фъстъчена паста
cs: arašídová pasta
da: jordnøddepasta, jordnøddepuré
de: Erdnusspaste
eo: pasto de ternukso
es: pasta de cacahuete, pasta de maní
fr: pâte d'arachide
hr: pasta od kikirikija, kikiriki pasta
it: crema di arachidi
pl: pasta z orzechów arachidowych, pasta z orzeszków arachidowych
pt: pasta de amendoim
sl: arašidova krema
sv: jordnötspasta
zh: 花生糊

en: peanut butter or peanut paste
da: jordnøddesmør eller -pasta
sv: jordnötssmör eller -pasta

en: pecan nut, pecan nuts, pecan, pecans
bg: пеканови ядки, американски орех
cs: pekanové ořechy
da: pekannødder
de: Pekannuss, Pekannüsse, Pekannüssen, Pecannüsse, Pecankerne, Pecannusskerne
el: καρύδια πεκάν
es: Nueces de pecán, pacanas, nueces pacanas, nuez pecana
et: pekaanipähkel, pekanipähklid, pekaanipähkleid
eu: pecan intxaurrak
fi: pekaanipähkinä, pekaanipähkinät
fr: noix de pécan
hr: pekan orasi
it: noci del pekan, noci di pecan, noce pecan
ja: ペカン
lv: pekanrieksti
mt: ġewż Amerikan
nl: pecannoot, pecannoten
nn: pekannøtter
pl: orzeszki pekan, Orzechy pekan łuskane, orzechów pekan
pt: nozes pécan
ro: nuci Pecan
ru: пекан
sk: pekanové orechy
sl: ameriški orehi
sv: pekannöt, pekannötter, pecannöt, pecannötter
zh: 碧根果

en: caramelized pecan nuts
da: karameliserede pekannødder
de: karamellisierte Pekannüsse
es: pecanas caramelizadas
fi: karamellisoidut pekaanipähkinät
fr: noix de pécan caramélisées
hr: karamelizirani pekan orasi
it: noci pecan caramellate
nl: gekaramelliseerde pecannoten, gekaramelliseerde stukjes pecannoten, gekarameliseerde pecanstukjes
sv: karamelliserade pekannötter

en: pistachio nuts, pistachio, American Pistachios, pistachio kernels
bg: шамфъстък, шам-фъстък
ca: festuc, festucs
cs: pistácie
da: pistacienød, pistacienødder
de: Pistazien, pistazienkerne, Pistazienkerne gehackt
el: φυστίκια, Φυστίκια κελυφωτά
es: pistachos, pistacho, alfóncigos
et: pistaatsiapähklid, pistaatsiapähkleid
fi: pistaasipähkinät, pistaasipähkinä
fr: pistache, pistaches, Pistache d'Egine
ga: cnónna pistéise
hr: pistacija, pistacije, pistaciju
hu: pisztácia
it: pistacchio, pistacchi, granella di pistacchi
ja: ピスタチオ
lt: pistacijos, pistacijų riešutai
lv: pistāciju rieksti, pistācijas rieksti
mt: pistaċċi
nb: Pistasjnøtter
nl: pistachenoten, pistache, pistaches
pl: orzechy pistacjowe, pistacje, pistacja, pistacji
pt: pistácios, pistácio, pistáchio, pistáchios, pistache, pistaches, pistacho, pistachos, pistacios
ro: fistic
ru: фисташки
sk: pistáciové oriešky
sl: pistacija, jedrca pistacije
sv: pistaschmandel, pistaschnöt, pistaschnötter, pistagenöt, pistagenötter
th: พิสตาชิโอ
tr: antep fıstığı
zh: 开心果, 阿月浑子

en: grilled pistachio nut, Dry roasted pistachios
de: Pistazienkerne geröstet
es: pistachos tostados
fr: Pistache grillée
it: pistacchio tostato
pt: pistacios torrados, pistácios torrados, pistácio torrados, pistáchio torrados, pistáchios torrados, pistache torrados, pistaches torrados, pistacho torrados, pistachos torrados, pistacios torrados

en: Shelled pistachios
de: geschälte Pistazien, Pistazienkerne geschält, Pistazienkerne geschält
it: pistacchi sgusciati
tr: kabuklu antep fistituz

en: pistachio nuts in shells
es: pistacho con cáscara, pistachos con cáscara
fr: pistaches en coques, pistache coque, Pistaches coques ouvertes naturellement
it: Pistacchi in guscio
nb: Pistasjnøtter med skall
nl: pistaches met schelp, pistachenoten zonder dop
pl: pistacje w łupinie
ru: Орехи фисташковые неочищенные

en: roasted pistachio nuts in shell, in-shell pistachios
it: pistacchio con guscio tostato